Nebraska, session 109, LB1095.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1095 LB1095
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 72-1239.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
72-1239.01 (1)(a) The appointed members of the council shall have
the responsibility for the investment management of the assets of the
retirement systems administered by the Public Employees Retirement Board
as provided in section 84-1503, the assets of the Nebraska educational
savings plan trust as provided in section 77-1420, the assets of the
achieving a better life experience program pursuant to sections 77-1401
to 77-1409, and beginning January 1, 2017, the assets of each retirement
system provided for under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act.
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the appointed
members shall be deemed fiduciaries with respect to the investment of the
assets of the retirement systems, of the Nebraska educational savings
plan trust, and of the achieving a better life experience program and
shall be held to the standard of conduct of a fiduciary specified in
subsection (3) of this section. The nonvoting, ex officio members of the
council shall not be deemed fiduciaries.
(b) As fiduciaries, the appointed members of the council and the
state investment officer shall discharge their duties with respect to the
assets of the retirement systems, of the Nebraska educational savings
plan trust, and of the achieving a better life experience program solely
in the interests of the members and beneficiaries of the retirement
systems or the interests of the participants and beneficiaries of the
Nebraska educational savings plan trust and the achieving a better life
experience program, as the case may be, for the exclusive purposes of
providing benefits to members, members' beneficiaries, participants, and
participants' beneficiaries and defraying reasonable expenses incurred
within the limitations and according to the powers, duties, and purposes
prescribed by law.
(2)(a) The appointed members of the council shall have the
responsibility for the investment management of the assets of state
-2-

LB1095 LB1095
2026 2026
funds. The appointed members shall be deemed fiduciaries with respect to
the investment of the assets of state funds and shall be held to the
standard of conduct of a fiduciary specified in subsection (3) of this
section. The nonvoting, ex officio members of the council shall not be
deemed fiduciaries.
(b) As fiduciaries, the appointed members of the council and the
state investment officer shall discharge their duties with respect to the
assets of state funds solely in the interests of the citizens of the
state within the limitations and according to the powers, duties, and
purposes prescribed by law.
(3)(a) (3) The appointed members of the council shall act with the
care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then
prevailing that a prudent person acting in like capacity and familiar
with such matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like
character and with like aims by diversifying the investments of the
assets of the retirement systems, the Nebraska educational savings plan
trust, the achieving a better life experience program, and state funds so
as to minimize risk of large losses, unless in light of such
circumstances it is clearly prudent not to do so. No assets of the
retirement systems, the Nebraska educational savings plan trust, or the
achieving a better life experience program shall be invested or
reinvested if the sole or primary investment objective is for economic
development or social purposes or objectives.
(b)(i) For any investments related to the retirement systems, the
appointed members of the council shall not engage in investment
activities in a restricted entity.
(ii) The appointed members of the council shall identify any
holdings of the retirement systems related to any such restricted entity
and shall divest from all holdings and other investment activity in such
entity as soon as practicable. Nothing in this subdivision (b)(ii) shall
be construed to require divestment from any such holdings or other
-3-

LB1095 LB1095
2026 2026
investment activity prior to the end of the term of such holdings or
other investment activity, if one exists, or in a manner contrary to such
appointed members' duties and responsibilities.
(4) Neither the appointed members of the council nor the state
investment officer shall be deemed fiduciaries with respect to
investments of the assets of a retirement system provided for under the
Class V School Employees Retirement Act made by or on behalf of the board
of education as defined in section 79-978 or the board of trustees
provided for in section 79-980. Neither the council nor any member
thereof nor the state investment officer shall be liable for the action
or inaction of the board of education or the board of trustees with
respect to the investment of the assets of a retirement system provided
for under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act, the consequences
of any such action or inaction of the board of education or the board of
trustees, and any claims, suits, losses, damages, fees, and costs related
to such action or inaction or consequences thereof.
(5) For purposes of this section, restricted entity means:
(a) A Chinese entity:
(i) Designated by Presidential Executive Order 13959, 85 Federal
Register 73185, dated November 12, 2020, relating to addressing the
threat from securities investments that finance Communist Chinese
military companies;
(ii) Designated by Presidential Executive Order 14105, 88 Federal
Register 54867, dated August 9, 2023, relating to addressing United
States investments in certain national security technologies and products
in countries of concern; or
(iii) Included in the Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked
Persons list maintained by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the
United States Department of the Treasury;
(b) A Chinese entity that:
(i) Is included on the Non-SDN Chinese Military-Industrial Complex
-4-

LB1095 LB1095
2026 2026
Companies List (NS–CMIC List), as such list existed on January 1, 2026,
maintained by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the United States
Department of the Treasury under Presidential Executive Order 14032, 86
Federal Register 30145, dated June 3, 2021;
(ii) Is a Chinese military company or a military-civil fusion
contributor and included on the list maintained by the United States
Department of Defense in accordance with section 1260H of the National
Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2021, Public Law 116-283, as
such list and section existed on January 1, 2026;
(iii) Is included on the list required under section 1237 of the
National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 1999, Public Law
105-261, as such list and section existed on January 1, 2026;
(iv) Is included on the Entity List set forth in Supplement No. 4 to
Part 744, 15 C.F.R. 744, as such part existed on January 1, 2026;
(v) Is included on the Denied Persons List pursuant to 15 C.F.R.
764.3(a)(2), as such list and regulation existed on January 1, 2026;
(vi) Is included on the Unverified List set forth in Supplement No.
6 to Part 744, 15 C.F.R. 744, as such list and regulation existed on
January 1, 2026;
(vii) Is included on the Military End User List set forth in
Supplement No. 7 to Part 744, 15 C.F.R. 744, as such list and regulation
existed on January 1, 2026;
(viii) Produces or provides communications equipment or service on
the list published by the Federal Communications Commission under section
47 U.S.C. 1601 of the Secure and Trusted Communications Networks Act of
2019, as such list and section existed on January 1, 2026;
(ix) Is included on the Uyghur Forced Labor Prevention Act Entity
List, maintained by the United States Department of Homeland Security, as
such list existed on January 1, 2026;
(x) Is included on the Withhold Release Orders and Findings List
issued by the Commissioner of United States Customs and Border Protection
-5-

LB1095 LB1095
2026 2026
Agency pursuant to the Uyghur Forced Labor Prevention Act, Public Law No.
117–78, as such list and act existed on January 1, 2026;
(xi) Is included on the list of covered issuers as defined in the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 maintained by the United States Securities and
Exchange Commission, as such list existed on January 1, 2026; or
(xii) Is otherwise included on any other list that existed on
January 1, 2026, maintained by the United States Government that
designates a Chinese entity for a restriction relating to investment,
contracting, or procurement;
(c) A Chinese entity otherwise subject to the control of a Chinese
entity listed in subdivision (a) or (b) of this subsection; and
(d) Any agency or instrumentality of the People's Republic of China.
Sec. 2. Section 72-1246, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
72-1246 (1) The state investment officer shall invest in investments
of the nature which individuals of prudence, discretion, and intelligence
acquire or retain in dealing with the property of another, and if the
state investment officer has special skills or is named on the basis of
representations of special skills or expertise, he or she is under a duty
to use such skills, subject to the direction of the Nebraska Investment
Council.
(2)(a) For any investments related to the retirement systems
administered by the Public Employees Retirement Board as provided in
section 84-1503, the state investment officer shall not engage in
investment activities in a restricted entity as defined in section
72-1239.01.
(b) The state investment officer shall identify any holdings of the
retirement systems related to any such restricted entity and shall divest
from any holdings or other investment activity related to any such entity
as soon as practicable. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
require divestment from any such holdings or other investment activity
-6-

LB1095 LB1095
2026 2026
prior to the end of the term of such holdings or other investment
activity, if one exists, or in a manner contrary to the state investment
officer's duties and responsibilities.
Sec. 3. Section 72-1254, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
72-1254 (1) The state investment officer shall report no later than
fifteen days after the close of each month to the Governor, the State
Treasurer, the Auditor of Public Accounts, the Department of
Administrative Services, and the members of the council on the operations
for the pooled accounts during such month. The report shall include a
summary of investments, purchases, and dealers utilized. Such reports
shall be available for public inspection in the office of the state
investment officer.
(2)(a) The state investment officer shall electronically provide
semiannual written reports to the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee
of the Legislature and the Clerk of the Legislature regarding any
investments related to the retirement systems administered by the Public
Employees Retirement Board as provided in section 84-1503, related to any
such restricted entity as defined in section 72-1239.01. The report shall
include the name of each such company or restricted entity, the asset
allocation class and sector to which it belongs pursuant to the asset
allocation policy and the amount of retirement systems funds invested
therein.
(b) The first report shall be due on or before January 15, 2027, and
shall contain information for the six-month period ending December 31,
2026. The second report shall be due on or before July 15, 2027, and
shall contain information for the six-month period ending June 30, 2027.
In each calendar year thereafter, reports shall be due:
(i) On or before January 15, containing information for the most
recent six-month period ending December 31; and
(ii) On or before July 15, containing information for the most
-7-

LB1095 LB1095
2026 2026
recent six-month period ending June 30.
Sec. 4. Section 84-602, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-602 It shall be the duty of the State Treasurer:
(1) To receive and keep all money of the state not expressly
required to be received and kept by some other person;
(2) To disburse the public money upon warrants drawn upon the state
treasury according to law and not otherwise;
(3) To keep a just, true, and comprehensive account of all money
received and disbursed;
(4) To keep a just account with each fund, and each head of
appropriation made by law, and the warrants drawn against them;
(5) To report electronically to the Legislature as soon as
practicable, but within ten days after the commencement of each regular
session, a detailed statement of the condition of the treasury and its
operations for the preceding fiscal year;
(6) To give information electronically to the Legislature, whenever
required, upon any subject connected with the treasury or touching any
duty of his or her office;
(7) To account for, and pay over, all money received by him or her
as such treasurer, to his or her successor in office, and deliver all
books, vouchers, and effects of office to him or her; and such successor
shall receipt therefor. In accounting for and paying over such money the
treasurer shall not be held liable on account of any loss occasioned by
any investment, when such investment shall have been made pursuant to the
direction of the state investment officer;
(8) To develop and maintain the website required under the Taxpayer
Transparency Act; and
(9) To award grants as provided under the Municipal Inland Port
Authority Act; and .
(10) On or before October 1, 2026, to create and publish on the
-8-

LB1095 LB1095
2026 2026
State Treasurer's website a list of restricted entities as defined in
section 72-1239.01 and update such list at least every six months, and
notify the Nebraska Investment Council and the state investment officer
of any updates to such list.
Sec. 5. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 6. Original sections 72-1246, 72-1254, and 84-602, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 72-1239.01, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 7. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-9-